test/stem-checker-test.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
   <sdefs>
     <sdef n="n"/>
     <sdef n="sg"/>
     <sdef n="pl"/>
   </sdefs>
   <pardefs>
	<pardef n="bab/y__n">
	   <e>
		 <p>
		   <l>y</l>
		   <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
		 </p>
	   </e>
	   <e>
		 <p>
		   <l>ies</l>
		   <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
		 </p>
	   </e>
	</pardef>
		<pardef n="fish__n">
	   <e>
		 <p>
		   <l/>
		   <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
		 </p>
	   </e>
	   <e>
		 <p>
		   <l/>
		   <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
		 </p>
	   </e>
	</pardef>
	

   </pardefs>
   <section id="main" type="standard">
		<!-- wrongly stemmed identity -->
		<e lm="baby"><i>baby</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
		
		<!-- correctly stemmed identity -->
		<e lm="lady"><i>lad</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
		
		<!-- wrongly stemmed identity -->
		<e lm="ability"><i>ability</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
		
		<!-- non-stemmed paradigms, should not be considered -->
		<e lm="fish"><i>fish</i><par n="fish__n"/></e>
		<e lm="deer"><i>deer</i><par n="fish__n"/></e>
		
		
   </section>
</dictionary>
